Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.075

Insider transactions.

(1) A business development company may not be a party to, nor engage in, an insider transaction, unless such an insider transaction is approved or ratified by its board of directors, exclusive of the vote of any interested director.

(2) Any insider transaction is subject to the examination and enforcement authority of the department under this chapter.

[ 2006 c 87 s 10.]